Missouri, session 2026, SB1245.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 34.074, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 34.069
and 34.074, to read as follows:
34.069. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Honorably discharged veteran", any individual who
is honorably discharged from any branch of the United States
Armed Forces as certified by the appropriate federal agency
responsible for the administration of veterans' affairs;
(2) "Honorably discharged veteran-owned enterprise":
(a) A sole proprietorship owned and controlled by an
honorably discharged veteran;
(b) A partnership or joint venture owned and
controlled by honorably discharged veterans in which at
least fifty-one percent of the ownership interest is held by
honorably discharged veterans and the management and daily
business operations are controlled by one or more of the
honorably discharged veteran owners; or
(c) A corporation or other entity:

SB 1245 2
a. At least fifty-one percent of which is owned by one
or more honorably discharged veterans or, if stock is
issued, at least fifty-one percent of the stock is owned by
one or more honorably discharged veterans; and
b. Whose management and daily business operations are
controlled by one or more of the honorably discharged
veteran owners.
2. In letting contracts for the performance of any job
or service, all agencies, departments, institutions, and
other entities of this state and of each political
subdivision of this state shall give a three-point bonus
preference to honorably discharged veteran-owned enterprises
that are doing business as Missouri firms, corporations, or
individuals or that maintain Missouri offices or places of
business.
3. In implementing the provisions of subsection 2 of
this section, the following provisions shall apply:
(1) The commissioner of administration shall have the
goal of three percent of all state contracts described in
subsection 2 of this section to be let to honorably
discharged veteran-owned enterprises;
(2) If an insufficient number of honorably discharged
veteran-owned enterprises submit a bid or proposal for a
contract let by an agency, department, institution, or other
entity of the state or of a political subdivision of the
state, the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection
shall not apply; and
(3) Any honorably discharged veteran-owned enterprise
that receives bonus points under this section shall not
receive bonus points under section 34.074.
4. The commissioner of administration may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule

SB 1245 3
or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
34.074. 1. As used in this section, the term "service-
disabled veteran" means any individual who is disabled as
certified by the appropriate federal agency responsible for
the administration of veterans' affairs.
2. As used in this section, the term "service-disabled
veteran business" means a business concern:
(1) Not less than fifty-one percent of which is owned
by one or more service-disabled veterans or, in the case of
any publicly owned business, not less than fifty-one percent
of the stock of which is owned by one or more service-
disabled veterans; and
(2) The management and daily business operations of
which are controlled by one or more service-disabled
veterans.
3. In letting contracts for the performance of any job
or service, all agencies, departments, institutions, and
other entities of this state and of each political
subdivision of this state shall give a three-point bonus
preference to service-disabled veteran businesses doing
business as Missouri firms, corporations, or individuals, or
which maintain Missouri offices or places of business.

SB 1245 4
4. In implementing the provisions of subsection 3 of
this section, the following shall apply:
(1) The commissioner of administration shall have the
goal of three percent of all such contracts described in
subsection 3 of this section to be let to such veterans;
(2) If no or an insufficient number of such veterans
doing business in this state submit a bid or proposal for a
contract let by an agency, department, institution, or other
entity of the state or a political subdivision, such goal
shall not be required and the provisions of subdivision (1)
of this subsection shall not apply; and
(3) Any service-disabled veteran business that
receives bonus points under this section shall not receive
bonus points under section 34.069.
5. The commissioner of administration may promulgate
rules in order to implement the provisions of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2010, shall be invalid and void.
✓